Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.210

Enforcement—Commission as a law enforcement agency.

(1) It shall be the duty of all peace officers, law enforcement officers, and law enforcement agencies within this state to investigate, enforce, and prosecute all violations of this chapter.

(2) In addition to the authority granted by subsection (1) of this section law enforcement agencies of cities and counties shall investigate and report to the commission all violations of the provisions of this chapter and of the rules of the commission found by them and shall assist the commission in any of its investigations and proceedings respecting any such violations. Such law enforcement agencies shall not be deemed agents of the commission.

(3) In addition to its other powers and duties, the commission shall have the power to enforce the penal provisions of this chapter and as it may be amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of or participation in gambling activities, including chapter 9A.83 RCW, and the manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. The director, the deputy director, both assistant directors, and each of the commission's investigators, enforcement officers, and inspectors shall have the power, under the supervision of the commission, to enforce the penal provisions of this chapter and as it may be amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of or participation in gambling activities, including chapter 9A.83 RCW, and the manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. They shall have the power and authority to apply for and execute all warrants and serve process of law issued by the courts in enforcing the penal provisions of this chapter and as it may be amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of or participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. They shall have the power to arrest without a warrant, any person or persons found in the act of violating any of the penal provisions of this chapter and as it may be amended, and the penal laws of this state relating to the conduct of or participation in gambling activities and the manufacturing, importation, transportation, distribution, possession, and sale of equipment or paraphernalia used or for use in connection therewith. To the extent set forth above, the commission shall be a law enforcement agency of this state with the power to investigate for violations of and to enforce the provisions of this chapter, as now law or hereafter amended, and to obtain information from and provide information to all other law enforcement agencies.

(4) Criminal history record information that includes nonconviction data, as defined in RCW 10.97.030, may be disseminated by a criminal justice agency to the Washington state gambling commission for any purpose associated with the investigation for suitability for involvement in gambling activities authorized under this chapter. The Washington state gambling commission shall only disseminate nonconviction data obtained under this section to criminal justice agencies.

(5) In addition to its other powers and duties, the commission may ensure sport integrity and prevent and detect competition manipulation through education and enforcement of the penal provisions of this chapter or chapter 67.04 or 67.24 RCW, or any other state penal laws related to the integrity of sporting events, athletic events, or competitions within the state.

(6) In addition to its other powers and duties, the commission may track and monitor gambling-related transactions occurring within the state to aid in its enforcement of the penal provisions of this chapter or chapter 9A.83 RCW, or any other state penal laws related to suspicious or illegal wagering activities, including the use of funds derived from illegal activity, wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal activity, use of agents to place wagers, or use of false identification by a player.

[ 2020 c 127 s 7; 2000 c 46 s 1; 1981 c 139 s 11; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 15; 1975 1st ex.s. c 166 s 10; 1974 ex.s. c 155 s 9; 1974 ex.s. c 135 s 9; 1973 1st ex.s. c 218 s 21.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.

Severability—1981 c 139: See note following RCW 9.46.070.

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 166: See note following RCW 9.46.090.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 155: See note following RCW 9.46.010.